Utah statutes.
53A-15-1211.   Report on performance of online course providers.

(1)  The State Board of Education, in collaboration with online course providers, shall develop a report on the performance of online course providers, which may be used to evaluate the Statewide Online Education Program and assess the quality of an online course provider.

(2)  A report on the performance of an online course provider shall include:

(a)  scores aggregated by test on statewide assessments administered under Chapter 1, Part 6, Achievement Tests, taken by students at the end of an online course offered through the Statewide Online Education Program;

(b)  the percentage of the online course provider's students who complete online courses within the applicable time period specified in Subsection 53A-15-1206(4)(c);

(c)  the percentage of the online course provider's students who complete online courses after the applicable time period specified in Subsection 53A-15-1206(4)(c) and before the student graduates from high school; and

(d)  the pupil-teacher ratio for the combined online courses of the online course provider.

(3)  The State Board of Education shall post a report on the performance of an online course provider on the Statewide Online Education Program's website.

